testing/sma-adj.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sma/bin/isma.hfstol
    Morph: sma/bin/sma.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sma/bin/isma-norm.fst
    Morph: sma/bin/sma-norm.fst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
  Adjective - aales: # ok
    aales+A+Attr: aales 
    aales+A+Sg+Nom: aales 

  Adjective - aalloes: # ok
    aalloes+A+Attr: aalloes 

  Adjective - aalvere: # ok
    aalvere+A+Attr: aalvere 
    aalvere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aalverabpa, aalveråbpoe]
    aalvere+A+Sg+Nom: aalvere 
    aalvere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aalverommes

  Adjective - aareh: # ? c
    aareh+A+Attr: aareh 
    aareh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aarebe, aarehkabpa, aarehkåbpoe, aaregabpa]
    aareh+A+Sg+Nom: aareh 
    aareh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [aaremes, aarehkommes, aaregommes]

  Adjective - aarehke: # ?
    aarehke+A+Attr: aarehke 
    aarehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aarehkabpa, aarehkåbpoe]
    aarehke+A+Sg+Nom: aarehke 
    aarehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aarehkommes

  Adjective - aarmogs: # ?
    aarmogs+A+Attr: aarmogs 
    aarmogs+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aarmoegabpa, aarmoegåbpoe]
    aarmogs+A+Sg+Nom: [aarmoge, aarmogs]
    aarmogs+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aarmoegommes

  Adjective - aavrehke: # ok
    aavrehke+A+Attr: aavrehke 
    aavrehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aavrehkabpa, aavrehkåbpoe]
    aavrehke+A+Sg+Nom: aavrehke 
    aavrehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aavrehkommes

  Adjective - aeblehts: # ?
    aeblehts+A+Attr: aeblehts 
    aeblehts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [aebliehtsabpa, aebliehtsåbpoe]
    aeblehts+A+Sg+Nom: [aeblehte, aeblehts, aebliehtadtje]
    aeblehts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aebliehtsommes

  Adjective - aejlies: # ?
    aejlies+A+Attr: aejlies 
    aejlies+A+Sg+Nom: [aejlie, aejles]

  Adjective - aelhkies: # ok c
    aelhkies+A+Attr: aelhkies 
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aelhkebe 
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Nom: aelhkie 
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aelhkemes

  Adjective - aelmies: # 
    aelmies+A+Attr: aelmies 
    aelmies+A+Sg+Nom: [aelmie, aelmes]

  Adjective - aelpies: # 
    aelpies+A+Attr: aelpies 
    aelpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aelpebe 
    aelpies+A+Sg+Nom: [aelpie, aelpies]
    aelpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aelpemes

  Adjective - aerkies: # ?
    aerkies+A+Attr: aerkies 
    aerkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aerkebe 
    aerkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aerkie, aerkies]
    aerkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aerkemes

  Adjective - aevhkies: # 
    aevhkies+A+Attr: aevhkies 
    aevhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aevhkebe 
    aevhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [aevhkie, aevhkies]
    aevhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aevhkemes

  Adjective - ammes: # 
    ammes+A+Attr: ammes 
    ammes+A+Sg+Nom: ammes 

  Adjective - baahke: # ok c 
    baahke+A+Attr: baahke 
    baahke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [baahkebe, baahkesabpa, baahkesåbpoe]
    baahke+A+Sg+Nom: baahkes 
    baahke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [baahkemes, baahkesommes]

  Adjective - baanhtsan: # 
    baanhtsan+A+Sg+Nom: baanhtsan 

  Adjective - baenehts: # 
    baenehts+A+Attr: baenehts 
    baenehts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [baeniehtabpa, baeniehtåbpoe]
    baenehts+A+Sg+Nom: [baenehte, baenehts, baeniehtadtje]
    baenehts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: baeniehtommes

  Adjective - baetjkies: # ok
    baetjkies+A+Attr: baetjkies 
    baetjkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: baetjkebe 
    baetjkies+A+Sg+Nom: [baetjkie, baetjkies]
    baetjkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: baetjkemes

  Adjective - barras: # 
    barras+A+Attr: barras 
    barras+A+Sg+Nom: barran 

  Adjective - barrehks: # 
    barrehks+A+Attr: barrehks 
    barrehks+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [barrehkabpa, barrehkåbpoe]
    barrehks+A+Sg+Nom: [barrehke, barrehks]
    barrehks+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: barrehkommes

  Adjective - beagkoes: # 
    beagkoes+A+Attr: beagkoes 
    beagkoes+A+Sg+Nom: beagkoes 

  Adjective - beajjetje: # 
    beajjetje+A+Attr: beajjetje 

  Adjective - beavloes: # 
    beavloes+A+Attr: [beavloes, beavls]
    beavloes+A+Sg+Nom: [beavloes, beavls]

  Adjective - besteles: # 
    besteles+A+Attr: besteles 
    besteles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bestielabpa, bestielåbpoe]
    besteles+A+Sg+Nom: [besteles, bestele]
    besteles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bestielommes

  Adjective - bieljehts: # 
    bieljehts+A+Attr: bieljehts 
    bieljehts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bieljiehtsabpa, bieljiehtsåbpoe]
    bieljehts+A+Sg+Nom: [bieljehte, bieljehts]
    bieljehts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bieljiehtsommes

  Adjective - bihtseds: # 
    bihtseds+A+Attr: bihtseds 
    bihtseds+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bihtsiedabpa, bihtsiedåbpoe]
    bihtseds+A+Sg+Nom: [bihtsede, bihtseds]
    bihtseds+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bihtsiedommes

  Adjective - bihtseles: # 
    bihtseles+A+Attr: bihtseles 
    bihtseles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bihtsielabpa, bihtsielåbpoe]
    bihtseles+A+Sg+Nom: [bihtseles, bihtsele]
    bihtseles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bihtsielommes

  Adjective - bissie: # 
    bissie+A+Attr: bissie 
    bissie+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: bissebe 
    bissie+A+Sg+Nom: bissie 
    bissie+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bissemes

  Adjective - boerehks: # 
    boerehks+A+Attr: boerehks 
    boerehks+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [boerehkabpa, boerehkåbpoe]
    boerehks+A+Sg+Nom: [boerehke, boerehks]
    boerehks+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: boerehkommes

  Adjective - buajtehks: # 
    buajtehks+A+Attr: [buajtehkes, buajtehks]
    buajtehks+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [buajtahkabpa, buajtahkåbpoe]
    buajtehks+A+Sg+Nom: [buajtehke, buajtehkes, buajtehke, buajtehks]
    buajtehks+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: buajtahkommes

  Adjective - buerie: # c 
    buerie+A+Attr: buerie 
    buerie+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: buerebe 
    buerie+A+Sg+Nom: buerie 
    buerie+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bööremes

  Adjective - byjjes: # 
    byjjes+A+Attr: byjjes 
    byjjes+A+Sg+Nom: byjjes 

  Adjective - byögke: # 
    byögke+A+Attr: byögke 
    byögke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [byögkebe, byögkesabpa, byögkesåbpoe]
    byögke+A+Sg+Nom: byögkes 
    byögke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [byögkemes, byögkesommes]

  Adjective - byögkehke: # 
    byögkehke+A+Attr: byögkehke 
    byögkehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [byögkehkabpa, byögkehkåbpoe]
    byögkehke+A+Sg+Nom: byögkehke 
    byögkehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: byögkehkommes

  Adjective - byögkeles: # LMM utan byögkele
    byögkeles+A+Attr: byögkeles 
    byögkeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [byögkelabpa, byögkelåbpoe]
    byögkeles+A+Sg+Nom: [byögkeles, byögkele]
    byögkeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: byögkelommes

  Adjective - byölehts: # 
    byölehts+A+Attr: byölehts 

  Adjective - båadtsah: # 
    båadtsah+A+Attr: båadtsah 
    båadtsah+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsakabpa, båadtsakåbpoe, båadtsahkabpa]
    båadtsah+A+Sg+Nom: [båadtsah, båadtsan, båadtsa]
    båadtsah+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båadtsakommes, båadtsahkommes]

  Adjective - båadtsoeh: # 
    båadtsoeh+A+Attr: [båadtsoeh, båadtsoeh]
    båadtsoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsoehkabpa, båadtsoehkåbpoe]
    båadtsoeh+A+Sg+Nom: [båadtsoeh, båadtsan]
    båadtsoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: båadtsoehkommes

  Adjective - båajhtoeh: # 
    båajhtoeh+A+Attr: båajhtoeh 
    båajhtoeh+A+Sg+Nom: båajhtoeh 

  Adjective - båavjoeh: # 
    båavjoeh+A+Attr: båavjoeh 
    båavjoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båavjoehkabpa, båavjoehkåbpoe]
    båavjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: båavjoeh 
    båavjoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: båavjoehkommes

  Adjective - båeries: # c 
    båeries+A+Attr: båeries 
    båeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båarasabpa, båarasåbpoe]
    båeries+A+Sg+Nom: båeries 
    båeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: båarasommes

  Adjective - båetije: # 
    båetije+A+Attr: båetije 
    båetije+A+Sg+Nom: båetije 

  Adjective - bårras: # 
    bårras+A+Attr: bårras 
    bårras+A+Sg+Nom: bårran 

  Adjective - bårrohks: # 
    bårrohks+A+Attr: bårrohks 
    bårrohks+A+Sg+Nom: [bårrohke, bårrohks]

  Adjective - bååktjehke: # 
    bååktjehke+A+Attr: bååktjehke 
    bååktjehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bååktjehkabpa, bååktjehkåbpoe]
    bååktjehke+A+Sg+Nom: bååktjehke 
    bååktjehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bååktjehkommes

  Adjective - bååvteres: # 
    bååvteres+A+Attr: bååvteres 
    bååvteres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bååvterabpa, bååvteråbpoe]
    bååvteres+A+Sg+Nom: [bååvteres, bååvtere]
    bååvteres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bååvterommes

  Adjective - bïjveles: # 
    bïjveles+A+Attr: bïjveles 
    bïjveles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bïjvelabpa, bïjvelåbpoe]
    bïjveles+A+Sg+Nom: [bïjveles, bïjvele]
    bïjveles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bïjvelommes

  Adjective - daajroes: # 
    daajroes+A+Attr: daajroes 
    daajroes+A+Sg+Nom: daajroes 

  Adjective - daaletje: # 
    daaletje+A+Attr: daaletje 

  Adjective - daanbeajjetje: # 
    daanbeajjetje+A+Attr: daanbeajjetje 

  Adjective - daemies: # 
    daemies+A+Attr: daemies 
    daemies+A+Sg+Nom: daemies 

  Adjective - daerpies: # 
    daerpies+A+Attr: daerpies 
    daerpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: daerpebe 
    daerpies+A+Sg+Nom: daerpies 
    daerpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: daerpemes

  Adjective - dasmoes: # 
    dasmoes+A+Attr: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dasmoesabpa, dasmoesåbpoe]
    dasmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dasmoesommes

  Adjective - dearkoeh: # 
    dearkoeh+A+Attr: dearkoeh 
    dearkoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dearkoehkabpa, dearkoehkåbpoe]
    dearkoeh+A+Sg+Nom: dearkoeh 
    dearkoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dearkoehkommes

  Adjective - dearkoes: # 
    dearkoes+A+Attr: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesabpa, dearkoesåbpoe]
    dearkoes+A+Sg+Nom: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dearkoesommes

  Adjective - dejpeladtje: # 
    dejpeladtje+A+Attr: dejpeladtje 
    dejpeladtje+A+Sg+Nom: dejpeladtje 

  Adjective - dovhtehks: # 
    dovhtehks+A+Attr: dovhtehks 

  Adjective - dovletje: # 
    dovletje+A+Attr: dovletje 

  Adjective - dovrehke: # 
    dovrehke+A+Attr: dovrehke 
    dovrehke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dovrehkabpa, dovrehkåbpoe]
    dovrehke+A+Sg+Nom: dovrehke 
    dovrehke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dovrehkommes

  Adjective - dovres: # c 
    dovres+A+Attr: dovres 
    dovres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dovresabpa, dovresåbpoe]
    dovres+A+Sg+Nom: dovres 
    dovres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dovresommes

  Adjective - dulvies: # 
    dulvies+A+Attr: dulvies 
    dulvies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dulvebe 
    dulvies+A+Sg+Nom: [dulvie, dulvies]
    dulvies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dulvemes

  Adjective - duvhties: # 
    duvhties+A+Attr: duvhties 
    duvhties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: duvhtebe 
    duvhties+A+Sg+Nom: [duvhtie, duvhties]
    duvhties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: duvhtemes

  Adjective - dåajmijes: # 
    dåajmijes+A+Attr: [dåajmijes, dåajmijs]
    dåajmijes+A+Sg+Nom: [dåajmijes, dåajmije]

  Adjective - dåsmoes: # 
    dåsmoes+A+Attr: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dåsmoesabpa, dåsmoesåbpoe]
    dåsmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dåsmoesommes

  Adjective - dæjpeles: # 
    dæjpeles+A+Attr: [dæjpeles, dæjpele]
    dæjpeles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dæjpalabpa, dæjpalåbpoe]
    dæjpeles+A+Sg+Nom: [dæjpele, dæjpeles]
    dæjpeles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dæjpalommes

  Adjective - dïeve: # 
    dïeve+A+Attr: dïeve 
    dïeve+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dïevebe, dïevesabpa, dïevesåbpoe]
    dïeve+A+Sg+Nom: dïeves 
    dïeve+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dïevemes, dïevesommes]

  Adjective - eadtjohkes: # 
    eadtjohkes+A+Attr: eadtjohkes 
    eadtjohkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [eadtjoehkabpa, eadtjoehkåbpoe]
    eadtjohkes+A+Sg+Nom: eadtjohke 
    eadtjohkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: eadtjoehkommes

  Adjective - ealjoeh: # 
    ealjoeh+A+Attr: ealjoeh 
    ealjoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ealjoehkabpa, ealjoehkåbpoe]
    ealjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: ealjoeh 
    ealjoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ealjoehkommes

  Adjective - ealjohts: # 
    ealjohts+A+Attr: ealjohts 
    ealjohts+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ealjoehtsabpa, ealjoehtsåbpoe]
    ealjohts+A+Sg+Nom: [ealjohte, ealjohts]
    ealjohts+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ealjoehtsommes

  Adjective - eejles: # 
    eejles+A+Attr: eejles 
    eejles+A+Sg+Nom: eejles 

  Adjective - eensi: # c 
    eensi+A+Attr: eensi 
    eensi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [eensigabpa, eensigåbpoe]
    eensi+A+Sg+Nom: eensi 
    eensi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: eensigommes

  Adjective - ellies: # 
    ellies+A+Attr: ellies 

  Adjective - elmies: # 
    elmies+A+Attr: elmies 
    elmies+A+Sg+Nom: elmies 

  Adjective - faatoes: # 
    faatoes+A+Attr: faatoes 
    faatoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [faatoesabpa, faatoesåbpoe]
    faatoes+A+Sg+Nom: faatoes 
    faatoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: faatoesommes
